District of Columbia statutes.
5-1401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Legal custody” includes imprisonment, jail, or detention.

(3)

“Ward” means any person in the official custody of the District government, on a temporary or permanent basis, because of neglect, abuse, mental illness or intellectual disability.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2902, 47 DCR 6308
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 13, 59 DCR 5567

History

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (3).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition of applicability provision, see § 2920 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2902 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).

Emergency Legislation

Mayor's Orders

Autopsies of Deceased Clients of the Mental Retardation and Developmental Disability Administration, see Mayor’s Order 2004-76, May 13, 2004 ( 51 DCR 5278).

Autopsies of Deceased Consumers of the Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Administration, see Mayor’s Order 2006-123, September 28, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9314).

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Editor's Notes